Vermont, session 2025-2026, H371.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 6 V.S.A. § 681 is amended to read:
§ 681. DEFINITIONS
VT LEG #379301 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.371
2025 Page 2 of 6
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(2) “Consumer commodity” means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic
and other article, product, or commodity of any other kind or class, except for
drugs sold only by prescription:
(A) that are customarily produced for sale to retail sales agencies or
instrumentalities for consumption by individuals, for use by individuals for
purposes of personal care, or in the performance of services ordinarily
rendered in or around the household; and
(B) that usually are consumed or expended in the course of such
consumption or use.
(2) “Dynamic pricing” means the use of artificial intelligence to adjust
the prices on the electronic shelf labels of consumer commodities at any given
moment.
(3) “Electronic shelf labels” are digital wireless display systems that
retailers use to show product prices at the point of sale.
(4) “Point of sale” means the point at which consumer commodities are
offered and displayed for retail sale in such a manner that the consumer may
examine and select commodities for purchase without the assistance of sales
personnel.
VT LEG #379301 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.371
2025 Page 3 of 6
(5) “Retailer” means a person who sells a consumer commodity in the
State at points of sale.
(6) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
(3)(7) “Unit price” of a consumer commodity means the retail price of a
consumer commodity expressed in terms of the retail price of such commodity
per such unit of weight, measure, or count as the Secretary designates,
computed to the nearest whole cent or fraction thereof as the Secretary
designates.
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 684 is added to read:
§ 684. USE OF ELECTRONIC SHELF LABELS; DYNAMIC PRICING
(a) A retailer selling a consumer commodity in the State may use electronic
shelf labels to disclose to consumers the retail price and unit price of the
consumer commodity for sale.
(b) A retailer using electronic shelf labels shall not use dynamic pricing to
alter the retail price or unit price of a consumer commodity while the retailer is
open to the public.
(c) A retailer shall not alter the retail price or unit price of a consumer
commodity until at least 24 hours since the last alteration to the retail price or
unit price for the consumer commodity.
Sec. 3. REPORT ON USE OF ELECTRONIC SHELF LABELS DYNAMIC
PRICING; MORATORIUM
VT LEG #379301 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.371
2025 Page 4 of 6
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Consumer commodity” means any food, drug, device, or cosmetic
and other article, product, or commodity of any other kind or class, except for
drugs sold only by prescription:
(A) that are customarily produced for sale to retail sales agencies or
instrumentalities for consumption by individuals, for use by individuals for
purposes of personal care, or in the performance of services ordinarily
rendered in or around the household; and
(B) that usually are consumed or expended in the course of such
consumption or use.
(2) “Dynamic pricing” means the use of artificial intelligence to adjust
the prices on the electronic shelf labels of consumer commodities at any given
moment.
(3) “Electronic shelf labels” are digital wireless display systems that
retailers use to show product prices at the point of sale.
(4) “Point of sale” means the point at which consumer commodities are
offered and displayed for retail sale in such a manner that the consumer may
examine and select commodities for purchase without the assistance of sales
personnel.
(5) “Retailer” means a person who sells a consumer commodity in the
State at points of sale.
VT LEG #379301 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.371
2025 Page 5 of 6
(b) On or before January 15, 2027, a retailer shall not use electronic shelf
labels or dynamic pricing to display the retail price or unit price of a consumer
commodity offered for sale at a point of sale.
(c) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall submit to the House Committees on Agriculture, Food
Resiliency, and Forestry and on Commerce and Economic Development and
the Senate Committees on Agriculture and on Economic Development,
Housing and General Affairs a report regarding the use by retailers in the State
of electronic shelf labels and dynamic pricing to display or alter the display of
the retail price or unit price of a consumer commodity. The report shall
include:
(1) a summary of how electronic shelf labels and dynamic pricing
operates, including the technology used to operate electronic shelf labels and
dynamic pricing;
(2) a summary of national state standards for regulation of the use of
electronic shelf labels or dynamic pricing, including whether entities such as
the National Institute on Standards and Technology have adopted
recommended provisions for the regulation of electronic shelf labels or
dynamic pricing; and
VT LEG #379301 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.371
2025 Page 6 of 6
(3) a recommendation on whether and how to use electronic shelf labels
or dynamic pricing in a manner that protects consumers from unfair pricing
strategies or mispricing.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 3 (moratorium; report on electronic shelf labels
and dynamic pricing) shall take effect on passage.
(b) Secs. 1 and 2 (allowed use of electronic shelf labels or dynamic pricing)
shall take effect on January 16, 2027.
VT LEG #379301 v.1